Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 4 BOILER INSPECTION
9-4-112. Regulations common to all types and services of boilers.

Each boiler shall be supported by masonry or structural supports of sufficient strength and rigidity to safely support the boiler. There shall be no excessive vibration in either the boiler or its connecting piping.

All boilers shall be so located that adequate space on each side will be provided for proper operation of the boiler and its appurtenances, for the inspection of all surfaces, tubes, water walls, piping, valves, and other equipment, and for their necessary maintenance and repair.

Inflammable or volatile materials shall not be stored in boiler rooms. Gas meters shall not be installed in boiler rooms.

There shall be provided to all boiler installations sufficient air to assure adequate combustion of fuel. There shall be ventilating air provided to prevent undue overheating in the boiler room. Nationally accepted standards such as the publications of the national fire protection association shall be followed in determining the adequacy of combustion and ventilating air.

Safety or safety relief valves, or both, shall be of adequate capacity to prevent accumulation of excess pressure with fixed settings not in excess of the maximum allowable working pressure of the boiler to which they are attached. All new safety relief valves shall bear stamping which indicates that they have been capacity-rated according to national board standards and that they have been constructed according to A.S.M.E. standards.

The use of weighted-lever safety valves shall be prohibited, and these valves shall be replaced by direct spring-loaded safety or safety relief valves that conform to the requirements of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code.

Safety valves having either a seat or disc of cast-iron construction are prohibited.

The safety or safety relief valve shall be connected directly to the hottest part of the boiler, independent of any other connection, without a shutoff valve of any description between the safety or safety relief valve and the boiler.

Each automatically fired boiler shall be equipped with a flame failure safeguard device which will positively discontinue flow of fuel to the firing chamber in event of absence of flame. Discontinuation must occur in time to prevent an explosive accumulation of fuel in the firing chamber and connecting passages.

Every safety or safety relief valve shall be connected to the boiler in an upright position with spindle vertical and shall be equipped with a try lever to test opening of the valve.

When a discharge pipe is attached to a safety or safety relief valve, it shall not be reduced less than the valve outlet and shall be as short and straight as possible and arranged to avoid undue stresses on the valve. There shall be no shutoff valve in such discharge pipe.

The discharge opening of safety or safety relief valves shall be so located that the released fluids and vapors cannot come into harmful contact with attendants or other persons. All safety or safety relief valve discharges shall be located or piped to clear running boards or platforms. Ample provision for gravity drain shall be made in the discharge pipe at or near each safety valve and where condensation may collect. Any discharge pipe extending above the safety or safety relief valve shall be equipped with a drain hole which will prevent accumulation of fluid above the valve disc.

All electric wiring to boilers and to electrically operated automatic devices and control mechanisms shall be of a high temperature resistant insulation, and wiring shall be in conduit or other approved covering.

All fuel and fluid piping valves and appliances shall be of materials listed in nationally approved standards, installed in a workmanlike manner, with such support as is necessary to prevent vibration. They shall be maintained so as to be free of leakage.

Repairs shall be made in accordance with the regulations set forth in the national board inspection code. Major repairs shall be reported to the section before being performed. The major repair procedure and the shop performing the repair must be approved by the section or the authorized insurer and an inspection made by a state or special boiler inspector before the boiler is used.

All boilers, unless exempt by this article, are subject to regular inspections as provided for in section 9-4-103 (4). Each boiler shall be prepared by the owner or user for inspections or hydrostatic test whenever necessary when notified by the inspector or the section. The owner or user shall prepare each boiler for internal inspection, when so requested by a state boiler inspector, in the manner prescribed in the national board inspection code.

If the boiler is jacketed so that longitudinal seams of shells, drums, or domes cannot be seen, enough of the jacketing, setting, wall, or other form of casing or housing shall be removed to permit the inspection of the size of the rivets, pitch of the rivets, and other data necessary to determine the safety of the boiler if such information cannot be determined by other means.

No person shall remove or tamper with any safety appliances prescribed by this article except for the purpose of making repairs.

All insurance companies insuring boilers operated in this state shall notify the section within thirty days after any insurance policy insuring a boiler has been written, canceled, not renewed, or suspended because of unsafe conditions.

If upon an external inspection there is evidence of a leak or crack, enough of the covering of the boiler shall be removed to permit a boiler inspector to determine the safety of the boiler; or, if the covering cannot be removed immediately, he may order the operation of the boiler stopped until such time as the covering can be removed and proper examination made.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 276, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-12.

L. 76:

(8) amended, p. 364, § 5, effective July 1.

9-4-113. New power boiler installations.

No power boiler, except those exempt by this article, shall be installed in this state unless it has been constructed, inspected, and stamped in conformity with the rules for construction of power boilers of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code and is registered with the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors, and inspected in accordance with the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations of the section.

A power boiler having the standard stamping of another state that has adopted a standard of construction equivalent to the standard provided in this article may be accepted by the director; however, the person or firm desiring to install the boiler shall make application for the installation and shall file with this application the manufacturer's data report covering the construction of the boiler in question.

All new power boiler installations and reinstalled boilers shall be installed in accordance with the requirements of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code and, in addition, in accordance with the requirements of this section.

All power boilers heated with gas, oil, or mechanical firing, except forced flow steam generators designed to operate without a fixed water level and stoker- or hand-fired coal-burning units which are constantly attended, shall be provided with an automatic low-water fuel cutout and with an automatic fuel-regulating control, controlled by boiler pressure or temperature, or both.

All new power boiler rooms shall be constructed to have at least two means of exit. Each exit shall be remotely located from the other. Each elevation shall have at least two means of egress, each remotely located from the other.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 277, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-13.

9-4-114. Existing power boiler installations.

The maximum allowable working pressure of standard boilers shall be determined by the applicable sections of the codes under which they were constructed and stamped. The maximum allowable working pressure on the shell of a nonstandard boiler or drum shell shall be determined by the strength of the weakest section of the structure computed in accordance with formulas provided by the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors or any other nationally recognized engineering authority.

Each power boiler having not more than five hundred square feet of water-heating surface shall have at least one approved safety valve. Each boiler having more than five hundred square feet of water-heating surface shall have two or more approved safety valves.

The safety valve capacity of each power boiler shall be that which will discharge all the steam that can be generated by the boiler without allowing the pressure to rise more than six percent above the highest pressure any valve is set, and in no case to more than six percent above the maximum allowable working pressure.

Power boilers equipped with one safety valve shall have the safety valve set at or below the maximum allowable working pressure. If additional valves are used, the highest pressure setting on additional valves shall not exceed the maximum allowable working pressure by more than three percent.

When two or more power boilers operating at different pressures and safety valve settings are interconnected, the lower pressure boilers or interconnected piping shall be equipped with safety valves of sufficient capacity to prevent overpressure, considering the generating capacity of the boiler with the lowest allowable pressure.

All power boilers shall have a water-feed supply which will permit the boilers being fed at any time while under pressure.

Power boilers that are fired with solid fuel not in suspension and having more than five hundred square feet of water-heating surface shall have at least two means of feeding water. Each source of feeding shall be capable of supplying water to the boiler at a pressure of six percent higher than the highest setting of any safety valve on the boiler, and one such source of feeding shall be steam-operated.

Power boilers fired by gaseous, liquid, or solid fuel in suspension and having less than five hundred square feet of water-heating surface may be equipped with a single source of feeding water if:

Means are provided for immediate shutoff of heat release;

The boiler furnace and fuel system do not retain sufficient stored heat to cause damage to the boiler if the water-feed supply is interrupted.

Power boilers that have a water-heating surface of not more than one hundred square feet shall not have water-feed piping and connection to the boiler smaller than one-half inch pipe size. For boilers having a water-heating surface of more than one hundred square feet, the water-feed piping and connection to the boiler shall not be less than three-fourths inch pipe size. The feed water shall be introduced into a boiler in such a manner that the water will not be discharged directly against surface-exposed gases of high temperature or to direct radiation from the fire or near any riveted joints of the furnace sheets or shell. The water-feed pipe shall be provided with a check valve near the boiler and a valve or cock between the check valve and the boiler. When two or more boilers are fed from a common source, there shall be a regulating valve on the branch to each boiler between the check valve and the source of supply. In all cases where returns are fed back to the boiler by gravity, a check valve and stop valve shall be on each return line, the stop valve placed between the boiler and the check valve, and both shall be located as close to the boiler as practicable.

Fire-actuated plugs, if used, shall conform to the requirements of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code for power boilers.

No outlet connections, except for damper regulator, feed-water regulator, low-water fuel cutout, drains, or steam gauges, shall be placed on the piping that connects the water column or gauge glass to the boiler. The water column shall be provided with a drain valve of at least three-fourths of an inch pipe size.

Each power boiler, except forced flow steam generators designed to operate without a fixed water level, shall have at least one water-gauge glass; except that boilers operated at pressures over four hundred PSI shall be provided with two water-gauge glasses which may be connected to a single water column or connected directly to the drum, in which case they shall conform to A.S.M.E. requirements. The gauge-glass connections and pipe connections shall not be less than one-half inch pipe size. Each water-gauge glass will be fitted with a drain cock or valve. When the boiler operating pressure exceeds one hundred PSI, the glass will be fitted with a globe or gate-valved drain.

The lowest visible part of the water-gauge glass shall be at least two inches above the lowest permissible water level, which level shall be that at which there will be no danger of overheating any part of the boiler when in operation at that level. This subsection (13) does not apply to forced flow steam generators which are designed to operate without a fixed water level.

Each power boiler shall have a steam gauge, with dial range not less than one and one-half times the maximum allowable working pressure, connected to the steam space or to the steam connection to the water column. The steam gauge shall be connected to a siphon or equivalent device of sufficient capacity to keep the gauge tube filled with water and so arranged that the gauge cannot be shut off from the boiler except by a cock placed near the gauge and provided with a tee or lever handle arranged to be parallel to the pipe in which it is located when the cock is open.

Each power boiler shall be provided with a one-fourth inch nipple and globe valve connected to a steam space for the exclusive purpose of attaching a test gauge when the boiler is in service so the accuracy of the gauge may be ascertained.

Steam-gauge connections shall be suitable for the maximum allowable working pressure and steam temperature; if the temperature exceeds four hundred degrees Fahrenheit, brass or copper pipe or tubing shall not be used.

When a steam-gauge connection longer than eight feet becomes necessary, a shutoff valve may be used near the boiler if the valve is of the outside-screw-and-yoke type and is locked open when the boiler is in operation. The line shall be of ample size with provisions for free blowing.

Each steam-discharge outlet, except a safety valve, shall be fitted with a stop valve located as close as practicable to the boiler. When such outlets are over two-inch pipe size, the valve used on the connection shall be the outside-screw-and-yoke rising spindle type to indicate, at a distance, the position of its spindle, whether it is closed or open. The wheel may be carried either on the yoke or attached to the spindle.

When power boilers provided with manholes are connected to a common steam main, the steam connection from each boiler shall be fitted with two stop valves having ample free-blow drain between them. The discharge of this drain shall be visible to the operator while manipulating the valves and shall be piped clear of the boiler setting. The stop valve shall consist preferably of one automatic nonreturn valve set next to the boiler and a second valve of the outside-screw-and-yoke type; or two valves of the outside-screw-and-yoke type may be used.

Each power boiler shall have a blow-off pipe fitted with a valve or cock. All fittings and pipe shall conform to the applicable section of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code.

Provisions shall be made for the expansion and contraction of steam mains connected to power boilers by providing substantial anchorage at suitable points so undue strain shall not be transmitted to the boiler. Steam reservoirs shall be used on steam mains when heavy pulsations of the steam currents cause vibration of the boiler shell plates.

All power boilers heated with gas, oil, or mechanical firing, except stoker- or hand-fired coal-burning units which are constantly attended, shall be provided with an automatic low-water fuel cutout and with an automatic fuel-regulating control, controlled by boiler pressure.

All cases not specifically covered by this article shall be treated as new installations or may be referred to the director for instructions concerning the requirements.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 278, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-14.

9-4-115. New miniature boiler installations.

No miniature boiler, except those exempted by rules promulgated by the division of oil and public safety, shall be installed in this state unless it has been constructed, inspected, and stamped in conformity with the rules of construction of miniature boilers of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code and is registered with the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors and inspected in accordance with this article.

A miniature boiler having the standard stamping of another state that has adopted a standard of construction equivalent to the standard of the state of Colorado may be accepted by the director; however, the person or firm desiring to install the boiler shall make application for the installation and shall file with this application the manufacturer's data report covering the construction of the boiler in question.

All new boiler installations and reinstalled boilers shall be installed in accordance with the requirements of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code and this article.

Upon completion of the installation, all boilers shall be inspected by a state or special boiler inspector. At the time of inspection, each boiler shall be assigned a serial number by the inspector, which serial number shall be stamped on or affixed to the boiler as provided by section 9-4-106 (3).

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 281, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-15.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1137, § 64, effective June 5.

9-4-116. Existing miniature boiler installations.

Miniature boilers shall be installed in accordance with the provisions in section 9-4-113 unless a special exemption is stated in this article or otherwise provided by the director.

The maximum allowable working pressure on the shell or drum of a miniature boiler shall be determined by the provisions of section 9-4-114 (1).

The factor of safety and the construction of miniature boilers, except where otherwise specified, shall conform to that required for power boilers.

Each miniature boiler shall be equipped with a spring-load, pop-type safety valve not less than one-half inch pipe size connected directly to the boiler.

The safety valve shall have sufficient capacity to discharge all the steam that can be generated by the boiler without allowing the pressure to rise more than six percent above the maximum allowable working pressure.

In cases where the miniature boiler is supplied with feed water directly from a pressure main or system without the use of a mechanical feeding device, the safety valve shall be set to release at a pressure not in excess of ninety-four percent of the lowest pressure obtained in the supply main or system feeding the boiler. Return traps shall not be considered mechanical feeding devices.

Each miniature boiler designed for operation with a definite water level shall be equipped with a glass water-gauge for determining the water level.

Miniature boilers operated in a closed system where there is insufficient space for the usual glass water-gauge may use water-level indicators of the glass bull's-eye type.

Every miniature boiler shall be provided with at least one water-feed pump or other water-feeding device, except where it is connected to a water main carrying sufficient pressure to feed the boiler or where it is operated with no extraction of steam, such system being commonly known as a closed system.

The water-feed pipe shall be provided with a check valve and a stop valve no less in size than that of the pipe.

Feed water shall not be introduced through the water column or gauge-glass connection while the boiler is under pressure.

Pressure of a feed water system greater than the maximum allowable working pressure of the boiler shall be fitted with a pressure-reducing valve before feed water is introduced into the boiler.

Each miniature boiler shall be provided with a blow-off connection, not less than one-half inch iron pipe size, connected directly to the lowest water space.

Blow-off piping shall not be galvanized and shall be provided with a valve or cock.

Each miniature boiler shall be equipped with a steam-gauge having its dial graduated to not less than one and one-half times the maximum allowable working pressure. The gauge shall be connected to the steam space or to a steam connection to the water column. The gauge or connection shall contain a siphon or equivalent device which will develop and maintain a water seal that will prevent steam from entering the gauge tube. The minimum size of a siphon, if used, shall be one-fourth inch inside diameter.

The steam piping from a miniature boiler shall be provided with a stop valve located as close to the boiler shell or drum as is practicable, except where the boiler and steam receiver are operated as a closed system.

For miniature boiler installations which are gas-fired, the burners shall conform to the requirements of the American gas association and the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code.

The heating element for electrically heated steam boilers, closed system, shall be so constructed that the temperature will not exceed one thousand two hundred degrees Fahrenheit.

All miniature boilers heated with gas, oil, or electrical energy shall be provided with an automatic low-water fuel cutout and with an automatic fuel-regulating control, controlled by boiler pressure.

All cases not specifically covered by this article shall be treated as new installations or may be referred to the director for instructions concerning the requirement.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 281, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-16.

9-4-117. New heating boilers and hot-water supply boilers installations.

No heating boiler or hot-water supply boiler, except those exempt by this article, shall be installed in this state unless it has been constructed, inspected, and stamped in conformity with the rules for construction of low-pressure heating boilers of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code and is approved, registered, and inspected in accordance with the requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 282, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-17.

9-4-118. Existing heating boilers and hot-water supply boilers installations.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a boiler built in accordance with the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code shall in no case exceed the pressure indicated by the manufacturer's identification stamped or cast on the boiler or a plate secured to it.

The maximum allowable working pressure on the shell of a nonstandard, riveted heating boiler shall be determined in accordance with section 9-4-114 (1) covering existing power boiler installations. In no case shall the maximum allowable working pressure of a steam-heating boiler exceed fifteen pounds per square inch gauge, or a hot-water boiler exceed one hundred sixty pounds per square inch gauge, at a temperature not exceeding two hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a nonstandard steel or wrought-iron heating boiler of welded construction shall not exceed fifteen pounds per square inch gauge. For other than steam service, the maximum allowable working pressure shall be calculated in accordance with the rules for construction of low-pressure heating boilers of the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a nonstandard boiler composed principally of cast iron shall not exceed fifteen pounds per square inch gauge for steam service or thirty pounds per square inch gauge for hot-water service.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a nonstandard boiler having cast-iron shell or heads and steel wrought-iron tubes shall not exceed fifteen pounds per square inch gauge for steam service or thirty pounds per square inch gauge for water service.

A radiator in which steam pressure is generated at a pressure of fifteen pounds per square inch gauge or less is a low-pressure boiler.

Each steam-heating boiler shall have one or more officially rated valves of the spring pop-type adjusted to discharge at a pressure not to exceed fifteen PSI. The safety valves shall be arranged so that they cannot be reset to relieve at a higher pressure than the maximum allowable working pressure of the boiler.

No safety valve for a steam-heating boiler shall be smaller than three-fourths of an inch except in case the boiler and radiating surfaces are a self-contained unit.

The safety valve capacity for each steam-heating boiler shall be such that with the fuel-burning equipment installed the pressure cannot rise more than five pounds above the maximum allowable working pressure.

Each hot-water boiler shall have not less than one officially rated pressure relief valve set to relieve at or below the maximum allowable working pressure of the boiler. Each hot-water supply boiler shall have not less than one officially rated relief valve or not less than one officially rated pressure-temperature relief valve of the automatic-reseating type set to relieve at or below the maximum allowable working pressure of the boiler. Relief valves shall be so constructed that they cannot be reset to relieve at a higher pressure than the maximum permitted pressure.

Seats and discs of safety relief valves shall be of material suitable to resist corrosion. No materials subject to deterioration or vulcanization when subjected to saturated steam temperature corresponding to capacity test pressure shall be used in any safety relief valve.

No safety relief valve shall be smaller than three-fourths of an inch nor larger than four and one-half inches pipe size.

When the size of the boiler requires a safety relief valve larger than four and one-half inches in diameter, two or more valves having the required combined capacity shall be used.

Each steam-heating boiler shall have a steam gauge connected to its steam space, or to its water column, or to its steam connection. The gauge or connection shall have a siphon or equivalent device which will develop and maintain a water seal that will prevent steam from entering the gauge tube. The connection shall be so arranged that the gauge cannot be shut off from the boiler except by a cock placed in the pipe at the gauge and provided with a tee or lever handle arranged to be parallel to the pipe in which it is located when the cock is open.

Each hot-water heating boiler or hot-water supply boiler shall have a pressure or altitude gauge connected to it or to its flow connection in such a manner that it cannot be shut off from the boiler except by a cock with tee or lever handle placed on the pipe near the gauge. The handle of the cock, when the cock is open, shall be parallel to the pipe in which it is located.

The scale on the dial of the pressure or altitude gauge for a hot-water heating boiler shall be graduated to not less than one and one-half nor more than three times the maximum allowable working pressure.

The scale on the dial of a steam-heating boiler gauge shall be graduated to not less than thirty PSIG nor more than sixty PSIG, and travel of the pointer from zero to thirty PSIG pressure shall be at least three inches.

In addition to the mandatory requirements for a pressure relief device, each hot-water heating or hot-water supply boiler shall be fitted with a temperature-actuated control, which will control the rate of combustion to prevent the temperature of the water from rising above two hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit at or near the boiler outlet. The control shall be constructed so that it cannot be set or reset to permit operation of the firing equipment when the temperature of the water is higher than two hundred degrees Fahrenheit.

When a pressure-actuated control is used on a steam-heating boiler, it shall operate to prevent the steam pressure from rising above fifteen PSIG.

Each automatically fired steam or vapor-system heating boiler shall be equipped with an automatic low-water fuel cutoff, so located as to automatically cut off fuel supply when the surface of the water falls to the lowest safe water line.

Each steam-heating boiler shall have one or more water-gauge glasses attached to the water column or boiler by means of valved fittings with the lower fitting provided with a drain valve of the straightway type with opening not less than one-fourth inch diameter to facilitate cleaning. Gauge-glass replacement shall be possible under pressure.

If, in the judgment of an inspector, a steam-heating or hot-water supply boiler is unsafe for operation at the pressure previously approved, the pressure shall be reduced, proper repair made, or the boiler retired from service.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 283, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-18.